Vermont, session 2025-2026, S217.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 10 V.S.A. chapter 164C is added to read:
CHAPTER 164C. MATTRESS COLLECTION PROGRAM
§ 7201. DEFINITIONS
VT LEG #385484 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.217
2026 Page 2 of 21
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Brand” means a name, symbol, word, or mark that attributes a
mattress to the producer of the mattress.
(2) “Consumer” means any person who presents or intends to present a
discarded mattress to a collection site operating an approved mattress
collection plan.
(3) “Discarded mattress” means any mattress that a consumer discarded,
intends to discard, or abandoned.
(4) “Energy recovery” means the process of burning or processing solid
waste materials to utilize the heat or other forms of energy within solid waste
materials.
(5)(A) “Foundation” means any ticking-covered structure that is used to
support a mattress and that is composed of one or more of the following:
(i) a constructed frame;
(ii) foam; or
(iii) a box spring.
(B) “Foundation” does not include any bed frame.
(6)(A) “Mattress” means any resilient material or combination of
materials that is enclosed by a ticking, that is used alone or in combination
with other products, and that is intended for or promoted for sleeping upon.
VT LEG #385484 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.217
2026 Page 3 of 21
“Mattress” includes any foundation, renovated foundation, or renovated
mattress.
(B) “Mattress” does not include:
(i) an unattached mattress pad or an unattached mattress topper,
including any item with resilient filling, with or without ticking, that is
intended to be used with or on top of a mattress;
(ii) a sleeping bag or pillow;
(iii) a car bed;
(iv) juvenile products, including a carriage, basket, dressing table,
stroller, playpen, infant carrier, lounge pad, crib bumper, and any pad for such
juvenile product;
(v) a product that contains liquid- or gaseous-filled ticking,
including any waterbed or air mattress that does not contain upholstery
material between the ticking and the mattress core; or
(vi) any upholstered furniture that does not otherwise contain a
detachable mattress, including a foldout sofa bed or a futon.
(7) “Mattress core” means the principal support system that is present in
a mattress, including springs, foam, air bladder, water bladder, or resilient
filling.
(8) “Mattress stewardship collection plan,” “mattress collection plan,”
or “collection plan” means the systems, methods, or mechanisms developed by
VT LEG #385484 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.217
2026 Page 4 of 21
producers or mattress stewardship organizations that pursue the goals of this
chapter.
(9) “Mattress stewardship organization” or “stewardship organization”
means the legal entity such as an organization, association, or other entity that
has developed a system, method, or other mechanism that assumes the
responsibilities, obligations, and liabilities under this chapter of multiple
producers of mattresses.
(10) “Performance goal” means a metric to annually measure the
performance of the mattress stewardship collection plan on how it is achieving
continuous, meaningful improvement to the rate of mattress collection and
recycling in the State and any other specified goal of the program.
(11) “Producer” means a person:
(A) who manufactures or renovates a mattress that is sold or offered
for sale in or into this State under the producer’s own name or brand;
(B) who owns a trademark or brand under which a mattress is sold or
offered for sale in or into this State, whether or not such trademark or brand is
registered in this State;
(C) who imports a mattress into the United States that is sold or
offered for sale in or into this State and that is manufactured or renovated by a
person who does not have a presence in the United States;
VT LEG #385484 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.217
2026 Page 5 of 21
(D) who manufactures or renovates a mattress for sale in or into the
State without affixing a brand name; or
(E) who assumes the responsibilities, obligations, and liabilities of a
producer as defined under subdivisions (A) through (D) of this subdivision
(11), provided that the Secretary may enforce the requirements of this chapter
against a producer defined under subdivisions (A) through (D) of this
subdivision (11) if a person who assumes the producer’s responsibilities fails
to comply with the requirements of this chapter.
(12) “Program mattress” means any discarded mattress that a
stewardship organization provides environmentally sound management for
under a mattress collection plan required under this chapter. “Program
mattress” does not mean a mattress transported from outside the State into the
State.
(13)(A) “Recycling” means any process in which discarded mattresses,
components, and by-products may lose their original identity or form as they
are transformed into new, useable, or marketable materials.
(B) “Recycling” does not include the use of incineration for energy
recovery.
(14)(A) “Renovate” or “renovation” means altering a mattress for the
purpose of resale, including replacing the ticking or filling, adding additional
filling, or replacing components with new or recycled materials.
VT LEG #385484 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.217
2026 Page 6 of 21
(B) “Renovate” or “renovation” does not include:
(i) the stripping of a mattress of its ticking or filling without
adding new material;
(ii) the sanitization or sterilization of a mattress without other
alteration of the mattress; or
(iii) the altering of a mattress by a renovator when a person retains
the altered mattress for personal use.
(15) “Renovator” means any person who renovates discarded mattresses
for the purpose of reselling the mattresses.
(16) “Retailer” means any person who sells mattresses in this State or
offers for sale or transfers mattresses in this State to other persons.
(17) “Sale” or “sell” means the transfer of title of a mattress for
consideration, including the use of a sales outlet, catalog, internet, or similar
electronic means. “Sale” or “sell” does not include the sale, resale, or transfer
of a discarded mattress that has not been renovated.
(18) “Sanitization” means the direct application of chemicals to a
mattress to kill human disease-causing pathogens.
(19) “Sterilization” means the mitigation of any deleterious substances
or organisms, including human disease-causing pathogens, fungi, and insects,
from a mattress or filling material using a process approved by the Secretary.
VT LEG #385484 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.217
2026 Page 7 of 21
(20)(A) “Ticking” means the outermost layer of fabric or material of a
mattress.
(B) “Ticking” does not include any layer of fabric or material quilted
together with, or attached to, the outermost layer of fabric or material of a
mattress.
(21) “Upholstery material” means all material, loose or attached,
between the ticking and the core of a mattress.
§ 7202. SALE OF MATTRESS; CONDITION ON SALE
Beginning on July 1, 2028, a producer of a mattress shall not sell, offer for
sale, or deliver to a retailer for subsequent sale a mattress unless all of the
following have been met:
(1) The producer is operating under an individual collection plan for
program mattresses approved by the Secretary or is participating in a mattress
stewardship organization implementing an approved collection plan for
program mattresses.
(2) The name of the producer, the producer’s brand, and the name of
mattresses are submitted to the Agency of Natural Resources by the producer
or a mattress stewardship organization and are listed on the producer’s or
mattress stewardship organization’s website as covered by an approved
collection plan.
VT LEG #385484 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.217
2026 Page 8 of 21
(3) The producer or mattress stewardship organization in which the
producer participates has submitted an annual report consistent with the
requirement of section 7206 of this title.
(4) The producer or the mattress stewardship organization in which the
producer participates has conducted a plan audit consistent with the
requirements of section 7206 of this title.
§ 7203. MATTRESS STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION;
REGISTRATION; OBLIGATIONS
(a) A producer may meet the requirements of this chapter by participating
in a mattress stewardship organization that undertakes the producer’s
responsibilities under this chapter.
(b) To qualify as a mattress stewardship organization under this chapter, an
organization shall:
(1) commit to assume the responsibilities, obligations, and liabilities of
all producers participating in the stewardship organization;
(2) represent at least 45 percent of the market share of mattresses sold in
the State;
(3) not create unreasonable barriers for participation in the stewardship
organization; and
VT LEG #385484 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.217
2026 Page 9 of 21
(4) maintain a public website that lists all producers and producers’
brands covered by the mattress stewardship organization’s approved collection
plan.
(c)(1) On or before July 1, 2027, and annually thereafter, a mattress
stewardship organization shall file a registration with the Secretary. The
Secretary shall provide the registration form to the stewardship organization.
The registration form shall include:
(A) a list of the producers participating in the mattress stewardship
organization;
(B) a list of the brands of each producer participating in the
stewardship organization;
(C) a list of the mattresses of each producer participating in the
stewardship organization;
(D) the name, address, and contact information of a person
responsible for ensuring compliance with this chapter;
(E) a description of how the stewardship organization meets the
requirements of subsection (b) of this section, including any reasonable
requirements for participation in the stewardship organization; and
(F) the name, address, and contact information of a person for a
nonmember manufacturer to contact regarding how to participate in the
stewardship organization to satisfy the requirements of this chapter.
VT LEG #385484 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.217
2026 Page 10 of 21
(2) A renewal of a mattress stewardship organization registration
without changes may be accomplished through notifying the Agency of
Natural Resources on a form provided by the Agency.
§ 7204. MATTRESS COLLECTION PLANS
(a) On or before January 1, 2028, a producer, individually or as a
participant in a mattress stewardship organization, shall submit a mattress
collection plan for program mattresses to the Secretary for approval.
(b) The plan shall include, at a minimum, all of the following:
(1) List of participants and products. A list of the producers, brands,
and products participating in the mattress collection plan and a methodology
for adding and removing producers and notifying the Agency of new
participants.
(2) Free collection. Provide for collection of discarded program
mattresses free of charge to consumers, provided that not more than four
discarded mattresses are provided to a collection site by a consumer at any one
time.
(3) Convenient collection.
(A) A description of how the producer or mattress stewardship
organization shall provide for a convenient and cost-effective collection of
discarded program mattresses that may include using existing public and
private waste collection channels and collection sites in the State pursuant to
VT LEG #385484 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.217
2026 Page 11 of 21
voluntary agreements. The description shall also include a description of how
the program will achieve within a reasonable period of time a minimum
convenience goal that ensures that all counties of the State shall have at least
one collection site, and within two years after the program approval, not less
than 70 percent of the State’s residents will live within a 30 mile radius of a
collection site, and within three years after the program approval, not less than
80 percent of the State’s residents will live within a 30 mile radius of a
collection site.
(B) To meet these convenience goals, the producer or stewardship
organization shall:
(i) enter into voluntary agreements to establish collection sites at
public and private solid waste facilities, transfer stations, landfills, recyclables
handling and recovery facilities that are permitted or registered with the
Secretary, or other suitable sites for the collection of discarded mattresses;
(ii) provide mattress storage containers at no cost to a participating
collection site;
(iii) negotiate mutually agreed upon voluntary agreements with
participating collection sites described in subdivision (i) of this subdivision
(b)(3)(B) that provide for reasonable compensation for the actual costs these
collection sites incur to handle, store, and transport discarded mattresses for
recycling;
VT LEG #385484 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.217
2026 Page 12 of 21
(iv) provide for bulk pickup service at no cost to collect a
minimum of 100 properly source-separated program mattresses at one time
from persons including:
(I) State agencies;
(II) municipalities;
(III) public or private disposal or solid waste transfer facilities;
(IV) health care, education, or military facilities; and
(V) hotels, motels, inns, and other establishments that provide
transient lodging;
(v) offer organizations that recycle or renovate discarded
mattresses the opportunity to participate as collection site; and
(vi) enter into voluntary agreements with retailers that pick up or
accept mattresses from consumers upon the purchase of a new mattress for
recycling.
(4) List of plan partners. The names and locations of collection sites,
transporters, and recyclers who will manage discarded mattresses delivered to
collection sites at the time of plan submission.
(5) Collection and disposition of discarded mattresses. A description of
how the discarded mattresses will be safely and securely collected and
transported, tracked, and handled from collection sites through final recycling
and processing, including:
VT LEG #385484 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.217
2026 Page 13 of 21
(A) a description of the methods to be used to reuse or recycle
discarded mattresses to ensure that the components, to the extent feasible, are
transformed or remanufactured into finished products for use; and
(B) a description of the methods to be used to manage or dispose of
discarded mattresses that cannot be recycled or reused.
(6) Education and outreach materials. A detailed description of the
outreach and educational methods and materials to be used under the plan,
including:
(A) materials that shall be provided to consumers, retailers, collection
sites, and transporters of discarded mattresses;
(B) outreach and education methods that will be used to encourage
municipal landfill and transfer station participation; and
(C) how such outreach materials and methods shall be evaluated for
effectiveness.
(7) Performance goals. A description of how the program will meet
annual performance goals, including collection, recycling, and reuse rates, as
determined by the Secretary, provided that, at a minimum, the program shall
achieve a 70 percent recycling rate of mattresses in the first program year.
(8) Retailer incentives. A description of what, if any, incentives will be
used to encourage retailer participation.
VT LEG #385484 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.217
2026 Page 14 of 21
(9) Additional information. Any other information required by the
Secretary to implement the program.
(c) A producer or a mattress stewardship organization shall:
(1) Notify the Secretary whenever there is a proposed substantial change
to their approved mattress collection plan. For the purposes of this subsection,
“substantial change” includes:
(A) a change in the processing facilities to be used for discarded
mattresses collected pursuant to the program; or
(B) a material change to the system for collecting mattresses.
(2) Not later than two years after initial approval of a mattress collection
plan, the producer or mattress stewardship organization shall submit to the
Secretary for review updated performance goals that are based on collection
under the program during the first two years of the program.
(d) A producer or a mattress stewardship organization shall notify the
Secretary of any minor changes to the mattress collection plan on an ongoing
basis without resubmitting the plan for the Secretary’s approval. These
changes include a change in the membership, officers, or contact information
of the organization.
§ 7205. RETAILER OBLIGATIONS; EXEMPTION
(a)(1) On and after July 1, 2028, no person shall sell or offer for sale a
mattress to any person in this State if the producer of the mattress does not
VT LEG #385484 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.217
2026 Page 15 of 21
have or is not participating in an approved mattress stewardship collection
plan.
(2) No retailer or distributor shall be found to be in violation of this
section if, on the date the mattress was ordered from the producer or its agent,
the producer of the mattress was in accordance with the provisions of this
chapter.
(b) A retailer shall not be responsible for an unlawful sale of a mattress
under this subsection if the retailer purchased the mattress prior to July 1,
2028, and sells the mattress on or before July 1, 2029.
§ 7206. ANNUAL REPORT; PLAN AUDIT
(a) Annual report. Annually, a mattress producer or a mattress stewardship
organization shall submit a report to the Secretary that contains the following:
(1) the weight of discarded mattresses collected by the producer or the
mattress stewardship organization in the prior calendar year;
(2) the percentage of discarded mattresses collected in the prior calendar
year that are from producers who are not participating in any approved
mattress stewardship organization;
(3) the collection rate achieved in the prior calendar year under the
mattress collection plan, including a report of the estimated total sales data by
weight for mattresses sold in the State for the previous three calendar years;
VT LEG #385484 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.217
2026 Page 16 of 21
(4) the locations of all collection points available under the mattress
collection plan and contact information for each location;
(5) examples and description of educational materials used to increase
collection;
(6) the weight of program mattress materials sent for disposal at each of
the following:
(A) energy recovery;
(B) landfills; and
(C) any other facilities;
(7) an evaluation of why the mattress materials sent for disposal were
not recycled and a description of program efforts to increase the recycling rate
of mattress materials under the mattress stewardship program;
(8) any substantial change to the mattress collection plan approved by
the Secretary pursuant to section 7204 of this title; and
(9) the cost of implementation of the mattress collection plan, including
the costs of collection, recycling, education, and outreach.
(b) Plan audit. After five years of implementation of an approved mattress
plan, a producer or mattress stewardship organization shall hire an independent
third party to conduct a one-time audit of the mattress collection plan and plan
operation. The auditor shall examine the effectiveness of the mattress
collection plan in collecting and recycling discarded mattresses. The
VT LEG #385484 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.217
2026 Page 17 of 21
independent auditor shall examine the cost-effectiveness of the plan and
compare it to that of collection plans or programs for discarded mattresses in
other jurisdictions. The independent auditor shall submit the results of the
audit to the Secretary as part of the annual report required under subsection (a)
of this section.
§ 7207. ANTITRUST; CONDUCT AUTHORIZED
(a) Activity authorized. A producer, group of producers, or stewardship
organization implementing or participating in an approved mattress collection
plan under this chapter for the collection, transport, processing, and end-of-life
management of discarded mattresses is individually or jointly immune from
liability for conduct under State laws relating to antitrust, restraint of trade,
unfair trade practices, and other regulation of trade or commerce under 9
V.S.A. chapter 63, subchapter 1 to the extent that the conduct is reasonably
necessary to plan, implement, and comply with the producer’s or stewardship
organization’s chosen system for managing discarded mattresses.
(b) Limitations on antitrust activity. Subsection (a) of this section shall not
apply to an agreement among producers, groups of producers, retailers,
wholesalers, or stewardship organizations affecting the price of mattresses or
any agreement restricting the geographic area in which or customers to whom
mattresses shall be sold.
VT LEG #385484 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.217
2026 Page 18 of 21
§ 7208. AGENCY RESPONSIBILITY
(a) The Secretary shall:
(1) Review for approval the mattress collection plan of a producer,
either individually or as part of a mattress stewardship organization.
(A) Not later than 90 days after the plan described in section 7204 of
this chapter is submitted, the Secretary shall decide whether to:
(i) approve the plan as submitted; or
(ii) deny the plan.
(B) If the Secretary denies the plan, the Secretary shall provide a
notice of determination to the producer or mattress stewardship organization
within 60 days after the decision, including reasons for the disapproval. The
producer or stewardship organization shall revise and resubmit the plan to the
Secretary not later than 45 days after receipt of the Secretary’s denial notice.
Not later than 45 days after the receipt of the revised plan, the Secretary shall
review and approve or deny the revised plan. The producer or mattress
stewardship organization may resubmit a revised plan to the Secretary not
more than twice. If the producer or mattress stewardship organization fails to
submit a plan that is accepted by the Secretary because it does not meet the
requirements of subsection (b) of this section, the Secretary shall have the
ability to require the producer or mattress stewardship organization to submit
modifications to the submitted plan prior to approval. The producer or
VT LEG #385484 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.217
2026 Page 19 of 21
mattress stewardship organization shall implement the mattress stewardship
program not later than 120 days after the approval of the plan by the Secretary.
(2) Maintain on the Agency of Natural Resources’ website information
on collection opportunities for mattresses, including collection site locations.
This information shall be made available in a printable format for retailers and
consumers.
(3) List the names of participating producers covered under approved
mattress collection plans on the Agency of Natural Resources’ website.
(4) Report biennially to the General Assembly on the operation of the
statewide system for collection, transportation, recycling, and recovery of
mattresses.
(b) The Secretary may adopt rules and regulations to implement the
requirements of this chapter.
§ 7209. FEES; DISPOSITION
(a) A producer or mattress stewardship organization shall pay $2,000.00
annually for operation of an approved mattress collection plan.
(b) The fees collected under subsection (a) of this section shall be deposited
in the Environmental Permit Fund established under 3 V.S.A. § 2805.
Sec. 2. 10 V.S.A. § 6621a(a) is amended to read:
(a) In accordance with the following schedule, no person shall knowingly
dispose of the following materials in solid waste or in landfills:
VT LEG #385484 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.217
2026 Page 20 of 21
* * *
(13) Mattresses after July 1, 2028.
Sec. 3. 10 V.S.A. § 8003(a) is amended to read:
(a) The Secretary may take action under this chapter to enforce the
following statutes and rules, permits, assurances, or orders implementing the
following statutes, and the Board may take such action with respect to
subdivision (10) of this subsection:
* * *
(32) 10 V.S.A. chapter 164B, relating to collection and management of
covered household hazardous products; and
(33) 10 V.S.A. chapter 24A, relating to the Climate Superfund Cost
Recovery Program; and
(34) 10 V.S.A. chapter 164C, relating to the Mattress Collection
Program.
Sec. 4. 10 V.S.A. § 8503(a) is amended to read:
(a) This chapter shall govern all appeals of an act or decision of the
Secretary, excluding enforcement actions under chapters 201 and 211 of this
title and rulemaking, under the following authorities and under the rules
adopted under those authorities:
(1) The following provisions of this title:
* * *
VT LEG #385484 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.217
2026 Page 21 of 21
(V) chapter 124 (trade in covered animal parts or products); and
(W) chapter 164B (collection and management of covered household
hazardous products); and
(X) chapter 164C (Mattress Collection Program).
(2) 29 V.S.A. chapter 11 (management of lakes and ponds).
(3) 24 V.S.A. chapter 61, subchapter 10 (relating to salvage yards).
(4) 3 V.S.A. § 2810 (interim environmental media standards).
Sec. 5. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385484 v.1